Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-1214
Intercity bus system assistance program; department; certify funding.

The department shall certify biennially the amount of intercity bus system assistance eligible for funding under section 13-1213.

Laws 1993, LB 158, § 9;

Laws 2004, LB 1144, § 2.